New Jersey, session 222, A4494.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.1970, c.226 (C.24:21-5)  is amended to read as follows: 5. a. Tests. The director shall place a substance in Schedule I if he finds that the substance:  (1) has high potential for abuse; and (2) has no accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; or lacks accepted safety for use in treatment under medical supervision. b.    The controlled dangerous substances listed in this section are included in Schedule I, subject to any revision and republishing by the director pursuant to subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.1970, c.226 (C.24:21-3), and except to the extent provided in any other schedule. c.     Any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, and ethers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of such isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)   Acetylmethadol (2)   Allylprodine (3)   Alphacetylmethadol (4)   Alphameprodine (5)   Alphamethadol (6)   Benzethidine (7)   Betacetylmethadol (8)   Betameprodine (9)   Betamethadol (10)  Betaprodine (11)  Clonitazene (12)  Dextromoramide (13)  Dextrorphan (14)  Diampromide (15)  Diethylthiambutene (16)  Dimenoxadol (17)  Dimepheptanol (18)  Dimethylthiambutene (19)  Dioxaphetyl butyrate (20)  Dipipanone (21)  Ethylmethylthiambutene (22)  Etonitazene (23)  Etoxeridine (24)  Furethidine (25)  Hydroxypethidine (26)  Ketobemidone (27)  Levomoramide (28)  Levophenacylmorphan (29)  Morpheridine (30)  Noracymethadol (31)  Norlevorphanol (32)  Normethadone (33)  Norpipanone (34)  Phenadoxone (35)  Phenampromide (36)  Phenomorphan (37)  Phenoperidine (38)  Piritramide (39)  Proheptazine (40)  Properidine (41)  Racemoramide (42)  Trimeperidine. d.    Any of the following narcotic substances, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)   Acetorphine (2)   Acetylcodone (3)   Acetyldihydrocodeine (4)   Benzylmorphine (5)   Codeine methylbromide (6)   Codeine-N-Oxide (7)   Cyprenorphine (8)   Desomorphine (9)   Dihydromorphine (10)  Etorphine (11)  Heroin (12)  Hydromorphinol (13)  Methyldesorphine (14)  Methylhydromorphine (15)  Morphine methylbromide (16)  Morphine methylsulfonate (17)  Morphine-N-Oxide (18)  Myrophine (19)  Nicocodeine (20)  Nicomorphine (21)  Normorphine (22)  Phoclodine (23)  Thebacon. e.     Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic substances, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)   3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine (2)   5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine (3)   3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine (4)   Bufotenine (5)   Diethyltryptamine (6)   Dimethyltryptamine (7)   4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxylamphetamine (8)   Ibogaine (9)   Lysergic acid diethylamide (10) Marijuana; except that on and after the effective date of the "New Jersey Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Act," P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), marijuana shall no longer be included in Schedule I and shall not be designated or rescheduled and included in any other schedule by the director pursuant to the director's designation and rescheduling authority set forth in section 3 of P.L.1970, c.226 (C.24:21-3). (11)  Mescaline (12)  Peyote (13)  N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate (14)  N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate (15)  Psilocybin (16)  Psilocyn (17)  Tetrahydrocannabinols, including those produced by way of manufacture, except when found in hemp or a hemp product cultivated, handled, processed, transported, or sold pursuant to the "New Jersey Hemp Farming Act," P.L.2019, c.238 (C.4:28-6 et al.), or cannabis or a cannabis item, as those terms are defined in section 3 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-33), that is grown, cultivated, produced, manufactured, or sold in accordance with the "New Jersey Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Act," P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.). f. Illicit fentanyls. Illicit fentanyls include any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that is not listed as a controlled substance in Schedules I through V, is not a Federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) approved drug, and contains any quantity of the following substances, their salts, isomers (whether optical, positional, or geometric), homologues (analogs), and salts of isomers, and homologues (analogs) unless specifically excepted whenever the existence of these salts, isomers, homologues (analogs), and salts of isomers and homologues (analogs) is possible within the specific chemical designations:i.  Furanyl Fentanyl, with a chemical composition of N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-2-furancarboxamide, monohydrochloride or N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-2-carboxamide; ii.  3-Methylfentanyl, with a chemical composition of 3-methyl-N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenethyl-4-piperidyl)-propanamide); iii.  3-Methyl Butyrylfentanyl, with a chemical composition of 3-Methyl, N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-butanamide, monohydrochloride; iv.  Valeryl Fentanyl, with a chemical composition of N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-pentanamide, monohydrochloride; v.  Norfentanyl, with a chemical composition of N-phenyl-N-4-piperidinyl-propanamide; vi. Para-Fluorobutyryl-Fentanyl, with a chemical composition of N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl) -4-piperidinyl]-butanamide, monohydrochloride; and vii.  Carfentanyl, with a chemical composition of 2-hydroxypropane-1, 2, 3-tricarboxylic acid; methyl 1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanoylanilino) piperidine-4-carboxylateor. (cf: P.L.2024, c.73, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.